Hawaii, session 2025, GM1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 235-55.75, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsections (a) to {c) to read as follows:
"(a) Each qualifying individual taxpayer may claim a
refundable earned income tax credit. [The] Unless otherwise
provided by law, the tax credit, for the appropriate taxable
year, shall be forty per cent of the federal earned income tax
credit allowed and properly claimed under section 32 of the
Internal Revenue Code and reported as such on the individual's
federal income tax return.
(b) For a part-year resident[—] or a nonresident, the tax
credit shall equal the amount of the tax credit calculated in
subsection (a) multiplied by the ratio of Hawaii adjusted gross
income to federal adjusted gross income.
(c) For purposes of this section, "qualifying individual
taxpayer" means a [taxpayer] resident or nonresident individual
that:
TAX-03(25)

Page 2
S.B. NO.
(1) Files a federal income tax return for the taxable year
claiming the earned income tax credit under section 32
of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(2) Files a Hawaii income tax return using the filing
status used on the federal income tax return for the
taxable year and claiming the same dependents claimed
on the federal income tax return for the taxable
year."
2, By amending subsection (g) to read as follows:
"(g) If nonrefundable credits claimed under this section
for any of the four consecutive taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2017, exceed the taxpayer's income tax liability
for the original claim year, the excess of the tax credits over
liability may be used as a credit against the taxpayer's net
income tax liability in subsequent years until exhausted;
provided that no credit carried forward under this subsection
shall be used as a credit for a taxable year beginning after
December 31, 2024. No nonrefundable credits claimed for the
taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and carried
forward under this section, shall be used as a credit for a
taxable year beginning after December 31, 2025."
TAX-03(25)

Page 3
s .B. NO.
SECTION 2, Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act, upon its approval, shall apply to
taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024; provided that
the amendments made to section 235 55.75(a), Hawaii Revised
Statutes, by this Act shall not be repealed when section 235-
55.75(a), Hawaii Revised Statutes, is reenacted on December 31,
2027, pursuant to section 5 of Act 163, Session Laws of Hawaii
2023 .

INTRODUCED BY:
BY REQUEST
TAX-03(25)

1466
S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 23rd day of April , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI'I

S.B.No. 1466
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: February 19, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date; APR 0 8 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the House
of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of
2025.
Speaker, House of Representatives
Clerk, House of Representatives
689